Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.401

Expenses.

If a derivative action is successful, in whole or in part, as a result of a judgment, compromise, or settlement of any such action, the court may award the plaintiff reasonable expenses, including reasonable attorneys' fees, from the recovery of the limited liability company.

[ 2015 c 188 s 78.]